District of Columbia statutes.
49-802

Date of commissions.

Any commission issuing under the provisions of this subtitle shall, where the rank remains unchanged, bear the date of the commission held on Feb. 18, 1909; and any officer who has served continuously in the same grade may be recommissioned with rank from date of his original commission to that grade.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 76

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-902.
1973 Ed., § 39-902.

Editor's Notes

The reference to “this subtitle” in this section includes all sections of Subtitle I of Title 49 except §§ 49-217, 49-303, and 49-906.